North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12M. Joint Legislative Health Care Oversight Committee. [Repealed]

§§ 120-70.110 through 120-70.112.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011.

History.

S. 120-70.110; 1997-443, s. 22.1(b); 1998-1, s. 2(a); repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.111; 1997-443, s. 22.1(b); 1998-1, s. 2(c); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(o); 2007-345, s. 12; 2007-532, s. 1.5; repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011. s. 120-70.112; 1997-443, s. 22.1(b): repealed by 2011-291, s. 1.6(b), effective June 24, 2011.

§§ 120-70.113 through 120-70.119.

Reserved for future codification purposes.